Hawaii, session 2025, HB836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii ranks fifth among states for the highest average total value of stolen goods per resident.  Many of those targeted are small businesses which comprise ninety-nine per cent of the business landscape in the islands.  The Honolulu Police Department confirmed that between October 2023 and January 2024, there have been about eighty smash-and-grab burglaries around the island. Recent crime data in California reported a steady increase in shoplifting between 2021 and 2022, and the state responded by adopting a measure increasing penalties for certain types of theft and burglary.  Hawaii should follow suit and adopt similar reform. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Target fencing operations and impose enhanced sentencing to those who knowingly receive stolen property or resell such property; (2)  Increase penalties for habitual property crime perpetrators; and (3)  Create steeper penalties for felony theft and burglary offenses. SECTION 2.  Section 708-803, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§708-803  Habitual property crime.  (1)  A person commits the offense of habitual property crime if the person is a habitual property crime perpetrator and commits a property crime. (2) For the purposes of this section, "habitual property crime perpetrator" means a person who, within ten years of the instant offense, has convictions for offenses within this chapter for: (a)  Any combination of two felonies or misdemeanors; or (b)  Any combination of either one felony or one misdemeanor and one petty misdemeanor; or (c)  Three petty misdemeanors. The convictions shall be for separate incidents on separate dates.  The prosecution is not required to prove any state of mind with respect to the person's status as a habitual property crime perpetrator. Proof that the person has the requisite minimum prior convictions shall be sufficient to establish this element. (3) A person commits a property crime if the person engages in conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter. It can be established that the person has committed a property crime by either the prosecution proving that the person is guilty of or by the person pleading guilty or no contest to committing any offense under this chapter. (4) Habitual property crime is a class [C] B felony. (5) For a conviction under this section, the sentence shall be either: (a)  An indeterminate term of imprisonment of [five] ten years; provided that the minimum term of imprisonment shall be not less than [one] five years; or (b)  A term of probation of [five] ten years, with conditions to include but not be limited to [one] five years of imprisonment; provided that probation shall only be available for a first conviction under this section." SECTION 3.  Section 708-830, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "PART IV. THEFT AND RELATED OFFENSES §708-830  Theft. A person commits theft if the person does any of the following: (1)  Obtains or exerts unauthorized control over property.  A person obtains or exerts unauthorized control over the property of another with intent to deprive the other of the property. (2)  Property obtained or control exerted through deception.  A person obtains, or exerts control over, the property of another by deception with intent to deprive the other of the property. (3)  Appropriation of property.  A person obtains, or exerts control over, the property of another that the person knows to have been lost or mislaid or to have been delivered under a mistake as to the nature or amount of the property, the identity of the recipient, or other facts, and, with the intent to deprive the owner of the property, the person fails to take reasonable measures to discover and notify the owner. (4)  Obtaining services by deception.  A person intentionally obtains services, known by the person to be available only for compensation, by deception, false token, or other means to avoid payment for the services.  When compensation for services is ordinarily paid immediately upon the rendering of them, absconding without payment or offer to pay is prima facie evidence that the services were obtained by deception. (5)  Diversion of services.  Having control over the disposition of services of another to which a person is not entitled, the person intentionally diverts those services to the person's own benefit or to the benefit of a person not entitled thereto. (6)  Failure to make required disposition of funds. (a)  A person intentionally obtains property from anyone upon an agreement, or subject to a known legal obligation, to make specified payment or other disposition, whether from the property or its proceeds or from the person's own property reserved in equivalent amount, and deals with the property as the person's own and fails to make the required payment or disposition. It does not matter that it is impossible to identify particular property as belonging to the victim at the time of the defendant's failure to make the required payment or disposition.  A person's status as an officer or employee of the government or a financial institution is prima facie evidence that the person knows the person's legal obligations with respect to making payments and other dispositions.  If the officer or employee fails to pay or account upon lawful demand, or if an audit reveals a falsification of accounts, it shall be prima facie evidence that the officer or employee has intentionally dealt with the property as the officer's or employee's own. (b)  A person obtains personal services from an employee upon agreement or subject to a known legal obligation to make a payment or other disposition of funds to a third person on account of the employment, and the person intentionally fails to make the payment or disposition at the proper time. (7)  Receiving stolen property.  A person intentionally receives, retains, or disposes of the property of another, knowing that it has been stolen, with intent to deprive the owner of the property.  It is prima facie evidence that a person knows the property to have been stolen if, being a dealer in property of the sort received, the person acquires the property for a consideration that the person knows is far below its reasonable value. (8)  Sale of stolen goods.  A person intentionally receives, retains, conceals, stores, barters, exchanges, returns for value, or attempts to sell the property of another, including online, knowing it has been previously stolen, with the intent to deprive the owner of the property.  It is prima facie evidence that a person has attempted to resell stolen property if the dealer in the property of the sort sells the property at a rate that is far below its reasonable value. [(8)](9)   Shoplifting. (a)  A person conceals or takes possession of the goods or merchandise of any store or retail establishment, with intent to defraud. (b)  A person alters the price tag or other price marking on goods or merchandise of any store or retail establishment, with intent to defraud. (c)  A person transfers the goods or merchandise of any store or retail establishment from one container to another, with intent to defraud. The unaltered price or name tag or other marking on goods or merchandise, duly identified photographs or photocopies thereof, or printed register receipts shall be prima facie evidence of value and ownership of such goods or merchandise.  Photographs of the goods or merchandise involved, duly identified in writing by the arresting police officer as accurately representing such goods or merchandise, shall be deemed competent evidence of the goods or merchandise involved and shall be admissible in any proceedings, hearings, and trials for shoplifting to the same extent as the goods or merchandise themselves." SECTION 4.  Chapter 706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§706-    Sentence of imprisonment for theft.  (1)  The court may sentence a person who has been convicted of an offense under chapter 708, part IV, to the imprisonment structure in paragraph (2). (2)  In addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the crime of which the defendant has been convicted, the court shall impose the following enhanced sentencing of: (a)  One year if the property value exceeds $50,000; (b)  Two years if the property value exceeds $200,000; (c)  Three years if the property value exceeds $1,000,000; (d)  Four years if the property value exceeds $3,000,000; and (e)  For property value in excess of $6,000,000, the court shall impose a term of one year per $3,000,000, in addition to the term specified in subparagraph (d)." SECTION 5.  Chapter 706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§706-    Sentence of imprisonment for burglary.  (1)  The court may sentence a person who has been convicted of an offense under chapter 708, part II, to the imprisonment structure in paragraph (2). (2)  In addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the crime of which the defendant has been convicted, the court shall impose the following enhanced sentencing of: (a)  Two years if the property value exceeds $50,000; (b)  Four years if the property value exceeds $200,000; (c)  Six years if the property value exceeds $1,000,000; (d)  Eight years if the property value exceeds $3,000,000; and (e)  For property value in excess of $6,000,000, the court shall impose a term of one year per $3,000,000, in addition to the term specified in subparagraph (d)." SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________